District of Columbia statutes.
8-1506

Rules.

By May 1, 1991, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter including rules regarding rates, fee and payment schedules, registration forms, reporting guidelines, and other operational provisions deemed necessary to fully implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-226, § 7, 38 DCR 219
This section is referenced in § 8-1502 and § 8-1503.
1981 Ed., § 6-3706.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-226, the District of Columbia Low-Level Radioactive Waste Generator Regulatory Policy Act of 1990, see Mayor’s Order 2007-126, May 31, 2007 ( 54 DCR 9065).